Rhode Island, session 2025, HB5600.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 16-77-3.1 of the General Laws in Chapter 16-77 entitled
"Establishment of Charter Public Schools [See Title 16 Chapter 97 — The Rhode Island Board of
Education Act]" is hereby amended to read as follows:
16-77-3.1. Legislative purpose.
(a) The purpose of this chapter is to provide an alternative within the public education
system by offering opportunities for entities identified in § 16-77-2.1 to establish and maintain a
high performing public school program according to the terms of a charter. The key appeal of the
charter school concept is its promise of increased accountability for student achievement in
exchange for increased school autonomy.
(b) Charter public schools are intended to be vanguards, laboratories, and an expression of
the on-going and vital state interest in the improvement of education. Notwithstanding the
provisions of this section or any law to the contrary, a charter school shall be deemed to be a public
school acting under state law and subject to the Age Discrimination Act of 1975, 42 U.S.C. § 6101,
et seq., title VI of the Civil Rights Act of 1964, 42 U.S.C. § 2000d, et seq., title IX of the educational
amendments of 1972, 20 U.S.C. § 1681, et seq., § 794 of title 29, and part B of the Individuals With
Disabilities Education Act, 20 U.S.C. § 1411, et seq. All students and prospective students of a
charter school shall be deemed to be public school students, having all the same rights under federal
and Rhode Island law as students and prospective students at a non-chartered public school. These
charter public schools shall be vehicles for research and development in areas such as curriculum,

pedagogy, administration, materials, facilities, governance, parent relations and involvement,
social development, instructor’s and administrator’s responsibilities, working conditions, student
performance and fiscal accountability. It is the intent of the general assembly to create within the
public school system vehicles for innovative learning opportunities to be utilized and evaluated in
pilot projects. The provisions of this chapter are to be interpreted liberally to support the purposes
set forth in this chapter and to advance a renewed commitment by the state to the mission, goals,
and diversity of public education.
(c) It is the intent of the general assembly to provide opportunities for teachers, parents,
pupils, and community members to establish and maintain public schools that operate
independently as a method to accomplish all of the following:
(1) Improve pupil learning by creating schools with rigorous academic standards in all
basic areas of instruction for high pupil performance;
(2) Increase learning opportunities for all pupils, with special emphasis on expanded
learning experiences for pupils who are identified as educationally disadvantaged and at-risk;
(3) Encourage the use of innovative teaching methods;
(4) Create opportunities for teachers, including the opportunity to be responsible for the
learning program at the school site; and
(5) Provide parents and pupils with expanded choices in the types of educational
opportunities that are available within the public school system;
(6) Hold the schools established under this chapter accountable for meeting publicly
promulgated, measurable, state and charter-based pupil academic results, and provide the schools
with a method to implement performance-based and/or other student-based accountability systems,
while providing a means to restrict the expansion of ineffective charter public schools; and
(7) Encourage parental and community involvement with public schools.
(d) No private or parochial schools shall be eligible for charter public school status, nor
shall a charter public school be affiliated in any way with a sectarian school or religious institution.
Any charter public school authorized by this chapter shall be nonsectarian and nonreligious in its
programs, admissions policies, employment practices, and all other operations. The board of
regents shall not approve a charter to a school whose overall operation or education program is
managed by a for profit entity.
(e) The commissioner is empowered to promulgate rules and regulations consistent with
this chapter, in conformance with chapter 35 of title 42, for the creation and operation of charter
public schools. These rules and regulations shall set forth the process for rescission of state approval
of a charter public school, including appropriate protections to ensure the continued provision of
LC002058 - Page 2 of 5

education services to the students of the charter public school whose charter is rescinded.
(f) All charter public schools shall adhere to financial record keeping, reporting, auditing
requirements, and procedures as required by the Rhode Island department of education and in
accordance with federal and state laws and regulations.
(g) No more than thirty-five (35) charters shall be granted. At least one-half (½) of the total
number of charter public schools in the state shall be reserved for charter school applications which
are designed to increase the educational opportunities for at-risk pupils. Local, written support shall
be required for a proposed charter that is a network charter school as defined herein. "Written
support" means a resolution or ordinance granted by the town or city council for each proposed
sending district where the council considers the fiscal and educational welfare of the municipality
and students after at least one public hearing.
(e) Charter public schools, as defined in § 16-77-2.1, shall be considered a network charter
school if the charter public school encompasses, or will encompass, elementary and secondary
schools or multiple elementary or multiple secondary schools.
(f) Charter public schools, as defined in § 16-77-2.1 and authorized as of the effective date
of this section, shall be exempt from subsection (d) of this section and shall not require local, written
support under subsection (d) for any proposed expansion or charter renewal.
(g) A proposed charter, or amendment to a charter for expansion, may proceed through the
approval process by removing districts that have not provided written support, in accordance with
this section, from the catchment area and may be approved with the remaining districts in the
catchment area; provided that, the application satisfies the requirements of regulations and law.
However, the charter may be revoked at any time if the school:
(1) Materially violates provisions contained in the charter;
(2) Fails to meet or pursue the educational objectives contained in the charter;
(3) Fails to comply with fiscal accountability procedures as specified in the charter;
(4) Violates provisions of law that have not been granted variance by the council on
elementary and secondary education; or
(5) After three (3) consecutive years of operation, is not a "high-performing charter
school," defined as a charter public school that has demonstrated overall success, including:
(i) Substantial progress in improving student achievement; and
(ii) The management and leadership necessary to establish a thriving, financially viable
charter public school.
(h) After denying, or prior to non-renewing or revoking a charter, the department of
elementary and secondary education shall hold a hearing on the issues in controversy under § 16-
LC002058 - Page 3 of 5

39-1.
(i) The establishment of new charter public schools shall be contingent upon state approval
and appropriation.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC002058
========
LC002058 - Page 4 of 5